Tennessee, session 114, HB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 313 of the Private Acts of 1982, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting SECTIONS 17 and 18 and substituting:
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding this act to the contrary, the County Commission
of Lauderdale County shall take such steps as necessary and appropriate for the
immediate and orderly relocation of the Probate and Juvenile Court of
Lauderdale County to the Justice Complex, including judges, personnel, staff,
court files, records, and any and all items necessary for the operation of the
Probate and Juvenile Court.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding this act to the contrary, upon expiration of the full
term of the judge presiding over the Probate and Juvenile Court in Lauderdale
County, the Probate and Juvenile Court of Lauderdale County shall be dissolved
immediately and its jurisdiction and duties transferred, as follows:
(a) In accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-16-201,
jurisdiction of probate court matters shall be transferred to the Chancery Court of
Lauderdale County, and probate-related clerk duties shall be transferred to the
Chancery Court clerk. The County Commission may transfer clerk-related duties
under this subdivision (a) at any time after approval and certification of this act in
accordance with Section 2; and
(b) In accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-210,
jurisdiction of juvenile court matters shall be transferred to the General Sessions
HB1423
003550
- 1 -

Court of Lauderdale County, and juvenile-related clerk duties shall be transferred
to the General Sessions Court clerk The County Commission may transfer clerk-
related duties under this subdivision (b) at any time after approval and
certification of this act in accordance with Section 2.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Lauderdale County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
- 2 - 003550